Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB488.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102 of Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 1102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Preregistrant." A person who is at least 16 years of age, 123456789101112131415161718192021 but not yet 18 years of age, who is otherwise eligible to register to vote in accordance with this part."Preregistration." A process in which a preregistrant submits the information necessary for voter registration and inclusion into the SURE system in accordance with this part prior to the time at which the preregistrant is eligible to actively register to vote under section 1301 (relating to qualifications to register).* * *Section 2. Section 1222(c) of Title 25 is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 1222. SURE system.* * *(c) Requirements.--The SURE system shall be developed as a single, uniform integrated computer system. All commissions shall be connected electronically to the SURE system and shall maintain their registration records in the system. The SURE system shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:* * *(22) Contain a code to enable identification and tracking of preregistration status.(23) Automatically activate the registration of a preregistrant no later than the preregistrant's 18th birthday.* * *Section 3. Section 1301(a) of Title 25 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1301. Qualifications to register.(a) Eligibility.--[An] Except as provided in subsection (a.1), an individual [who] shall be eligible to register to vote 20250SB0488PN0460 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if the individual:(1) will be at least 18 years of age on the day of the next election[, who];(2) has been a citizen of the United States for at least one month prior to the next election and [who] has resided in this Commonwealth and the election district where the individual offers to vote for at least 30 days prior to the next ensuing election; and(3) has not been confined in a penal institution for a conviction of a felony within the last five years [shall be eligible to register as provided in this chapter].(a.1) Preregistration.--Notwithstanding subsection (a)(1), a preregistrant may preregister to vote, provided that the preregistrant may not vote in any election before reaching 18 years of age. The department shall provide guidance within 90 days of the effective date of this subsection to assist commissions in implementing preregistration.* * *Section 4. Section 1325(b)(4) of Title 25 is amended to read:§ 1325. Government agencies.* * *(b) Forms.--An agency designated in subsection (a) shall provide a form for office visits or, if the agency provides services to persons with disabilities, for home visits which contains all of the following:* * *(4) The statement "In order to be qualified to register to vote, you must be at least 18 years of age on the day of the next election, you must have been a citizen of the United 20250SB0488PN0460 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 States for at least one month prior to the next election and have resided in Pennsylvania and the election district where you plan to vote for at least 30 days prior to the next election, and you must not have been confined in a penal institution for a conviction of a felony within the last five years[."]. You may preregister to vote if you are at least 16 years of age, provided you may not vote in an election until you reach 18 years of age."* * *Section 5. Title 25 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1326.1. Preregistration data entry.In the case of preregistration, each commission shall enter preregistration information into the SURE system upon receipt of the information and ensure that each preregistrant is actively registered to vote no later than the preregistrant's 18th birthday.Section 6. Sections 1327(a)(4)(iii) and (b)(1)(ii) and 1505(a) of Title 25 are amended to read:§ 1327. Preparation and distribution of applications.(a) Form.--* * *(4) A voter registration application shall be printed on stock of good quality and shall be of suitable uniform size. Nothing in this part shall prohibit the design and use of an electronic voter registration application which includes the applicant's digitized or electronic signature. The registration application shall contain the following information; however, the information may be provided on a separate form for voter registration made under section 1323 or 1325:20250SB0488PN0460 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(iii) Notice that the applicant must be a citizen of the United States for at least one month prior to the next election and a resident of this Commonwealth and the election district for at least 30 days and must be at least 18 years of age by the day of the next ensuing election, unless the individual is at least 16 years of age and preregisters to vote, and has not been confined in a penal institution for a conviction of a felony within the last five years. The notice required in this subparagraph shall be in print identical to the declaration under subsection (b).* * *(b) Registration declaration.--(1) The official voter registration application shall contain a registration declaration. On the declaration, the applicant shall state all of the following:* * *(ii) On the day of the next ensuing election, the applicant shall be at least 18 years of age[.], unless the applicant is preregistering to vote in the next election in which the individual reaches 18 years of age.* * *§ 1505. Death of registrant.(a) Department of Health.--A commission shall cancel the registration of a registered elector or the preregistration of a preregistrant reported dead by the Department of Health. The Department of Health shall, within 60 days of receiving notice of the death of an individual [18] 16 years of age or older, send the name and address of residence of that individual to a 20250SB0488PN0460 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission in a manner and on a form prescribed by the department. The commission shall promptly update information contained in its registration records.* * *Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0488PN0460 - 6 - 12345